Massachusetts, session 194th, H4453.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 25 of chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding after
subsection (5) the following subsection:
(6) a single vehicle owned and registered for personal, non-commercial use, up to the
value of $10,000 as determined by the valuation method established pursuant to section 1 of
chapter 60A of the General Laws.
of 1